Florida, session 2026, HB231.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (136) is added to section 320.08058,
Florida Statutes, to read:
320.08058 Specialty license plates.—
(136) ULTIMATE FIGHTING CHAMPIONSHIP (UFC) LICENSE
PLATES.—
(a) The department shall develop an Ultimate Fighting
Championship (UFC) license plate as provided in this section and
s. 320.08053. The plate must bear the colors and design approved
by the department. The word "Florida" must appear at the top of
the plate, and the words "UFC Lives Here" must appear at the
bottom of the plate.
(b) The annual use fees from the sale of the plate must be
distributed to the UFC Foundation, a nonprofit corporation under
s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which may use up to
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb231-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 231 2026
10 percent of the proceeds to promote and market the plate. The
UFC Foundation shall use the remainder of the proceeds to
support charities and nonprofits in this state that align with
the foundation's mission and goals, such as children's
hospitals, support for first responders and the military, and
youth advocacy and mentorship, and to fund the development and
operation of youth mentorship programs in partnership with local
law enforcement agencies.
Section 2. This act shall take effect October 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb231-00